New Jersey, session 221, A445.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.2005, c.383 (C.26:3D-58) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a. Smoking is prohibited in an indoor public place or workplace, or within a distance of 20 feet from the exterior of any building which is an indoor public place or workplace, except as otherwise provided in this act. b.    Smoking is prohibited in any area of any building of, or on the grounds of, any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, regardless of whether the area is an indoor public place or is outdoors. (cf: P.L.2005, c.383, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.